North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7A. Judicial Department.
Article 29. Administrative Office of the Courts.

§ 7A-340.
Administrative Office of the Courts; establishment; officers.

There is hereby established a State office to be known as the Administrative Office of the Courts. It shall be supervised by a Director, assisted by an assistant director.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to reports on vacant positions in the Judicial Department, see

G.S. 120-12.1

.

As to authorization for the Legislative Services Commission and the Administrative Office of the Courts to establish safety and health programs for their employees, see

G.S. 143-589

.

E-Courts Information Technology Initiative.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 18A.21(a)-(e), provides: “(a) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish a strategic plan for the design and implementation of its e-Courts information technology initiative by February 1, 2016. The e-Courts initiative, when fully implemented, will provide for the automation of all court processes, including the electronic filing, retrieval, and processing of documents. The strategic plan shall:

“(1) Clearly articulate the requirements for the e-Courts system, including well-defined milestones, costs parameters, and performance measures.

“(2) Prioritize the funding needs for implementation of the various elements of the system, after consultation with the e-Courts advisory committee established by subsection (c) of this section.

“(3) Identify any potential issues that may arise in the development of the system and plans for mitigating those issues.

“(4) Address the potential for incorporating any currently existing resources into the e-Courts system.

“(b) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall report quarterly beginning November 1, 2015, to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Information Technology on the development, implementation, and specific costs of the strategic plan required by subsection (a) of this section and on any changes in the projected costs for implementing the e-Courts system or the schedule for implementation. The report shall also provide an accounting of the use of funds appropriated in this act for development of the e-Courts initiative.

“(c) The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish an e-Courts advisory committee consisting of clerks of superior court, judges, district attorneys, public defenders, and representatives of the State Bar in order to ensure that, in the development and implementation of the strategic plan required by subsection (a) of this section, it has the input and advice of those stakeholders in the e-Courts system and the benefit of the various stakeholders’ expertise on the information technology needs of the courts. The advisory committee shall be guided by an executive steering committee.

“(d) Upon completion of the strategic plan required by subsection (a) of this section, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall issue a Request for Information (RFI) for a contractor to provide the e-Courts system as outlined in the strategic plan. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall evaluate the responses to the RFI before issuing a Request for Proposals (RFP) for the e-Courts system.

“(e) As a precursor to the implementation of its e-Courts initiative, the Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish a pilot program in New Hanover County for the online collection and payment of court costs, fines, and related fees, with the potential of expanding the program statewide at the conclusion of a successful pilot. The costs incurred by the programs established pursuant to this section shall be borne by vendors selected by the Administrative Office of the Courts. The Administrative Office of the Courts shall report by March 1, 2016, to the chairs of the Joint Legislative Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety on the pilot program established pursuant to this section and its plans to expand the program statewide.”

Session Laws 2018-5, s. 18B.4(b), provides: “The Administrative Office of the Courts (AOC) shall develop a plan for implementing the e-Courts system, including estimates of the overall scope, the overall cost, annual costs, and the benchmarks that will be met in each year of the project. AOC is encouraged to consult with the Department of Information Technology when developing the plan for the e-Courts system. AOC shall submit the plan for the e-Courts system to the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety no later than March 1, 2019.”

§ 7A-341.
Appointment and compensation of Director.

The Director shall be appointed by the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court, to serve at the pleasure of the Chief Justice. The Director’s annual compensation shall be the same salary amount set for the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals as provided in the Current Operations Appropriations Act, payable monthly, and reimbursement for travel and subsistence expenses at the same rate as State employees generally and longevity pay at the rates and for the service designated in

G.S. 7A-18

for a judge of the Court of Appeals. Service as Director shall be equivalent to service as a judge of the Court of Appeals for the purposes of entitlement to retirement pay or to retirement for disability.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 691, s. 36; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 165; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 15(a); 2015-241, s. 30.3(f).

School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 6.24, provides for the development and implementation of a School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. See note at

G.S. 115C-105.20

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 30.3(f), effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence, substituted “at the pleasure of the Chief Justice” for “at his pleasure,” in the second
sentence, substituted “The Director’s annual compensation shall be the same salary amount set for the Chief Judge of the Court of Appeals as” for “He shall receive the annual salary,” “7A-18” for “7A-44(b)” and “Court of Appeals” for “superior court,” and in the last sentence, substituted “judge of the Court of Appeals” for “superior court judge.”

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Longevity Pay. —

Upon taking office as an Associate Justice of the North Carolina Supreme Court, a justice was entitled to have his service as Director and Assistant Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts to be taken into account in calculating his service for longevity purposes, but his service as assistant district attorney could not be taken into account. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Thomas W. Ross, Director, The Administrative Office of the Courts, 1999 N.C. AG LEXIS 28 (9/28/99).

§ 7A-342.
Appointment and compensation of assistant director and other employees.

The assistant director shall also be appointed by the Chief Justice, to serve at his pleasure. The assistant director shall receive the annual salary provided in the Current Operations Appropriations Act, payable monthly, and reimbursement for travel and subsistence expenses at the same rate as State employees generally and longevity pay at the rates and for the service designated in G.S. 7A-144(b) for a judge of the district court.

The Director may appoint such other assistant and employees as are necessary to enable him to perform the duties of his office.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 691, s. 37; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 165; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1100, s. 15(b).

§ 7A-343.
Duties of Director.

The Director is the Administrative Officer of the Courts, and the Director’s duties include all of the following:

Collect and compile statistical data and other information on the judicial and financial operation of the courts and on the operation of other offices directly related to and serving the courts.

Determine the state of the dockets and evaluate the practices and procedures of the courts, and make recommendations concerning the number of judges, district attorneys, and magistrates required for the efficient administration of justice.

Prescribe uniform administrative and business methods, systems, forms and records to be used in the offices of the clerks of superior court.

(3a)

Maintain and staff as necessary an Internal Audit Division of the Judicial Department and the Administrative Office of the Courts that:

Evaluates and discloses potential weaknesses in the effectiveness of internal controls in the court system for the purpose of safeguarding public funds and assets and minimizing incidences of fraud, waste, and abuse.

Examines and analyzes the design and effectiveness of administrative and procedural operations.

Ensures overall compliance with federal and State laws, internal and external regulations, rules and procedures, and other applicable requirements.

Inspects and reviews the effectiveness and efficiency of processes and proceedings conducted by judicial officers.

Collaborates with other divisions to guide, direct, and support court officials in efforts to conform to both recommended and required compliance standards.

Executes routine audits of the Judicial Department’s systems and controls, including, but not limited to:

Accounting systems and controls.

Administrative systems and controls.

Electronic data processing systems and controls.

Prepare and submit budget estimates of State appropriations necessary for the maintenance and operation of the Judicial Department, and authorize expenditures from funds appropriated for these purposes.

Investigate, make recommendations concerning, and assist in the securing of adequate physical accommodations for the General Court of Justice.

Procure, distribute, exchange, transfer, and assign such equipment, books, forms and supplies as are to be acquired with State funds for the General Court of Justice.

Make recommendations for the improvement of the operations of the Judicial Department.

Prepare and submit an annual report on the work of the Judicial Department to the Chief Justice, and transmit a copy by March 15 of each year to the Chairs of the House of Representatives and Senate Appropriations Committees on Justice and Public Safety and to the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety.

(8a)

Prepare and submit an annual report on the activities of each North Carolina business court site to the Chief Justice, the chairs of the House of Representatives Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the chairs of the of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety, and all other members of the General Assembly on February 1. The report shall include the following information for each business court site:

The number of new, closed, and pending cases for the previous three years.

The average age of pending cases.

The number of motions pending over six months after being filed.

The number of cases in which bench trials have been concluded for over six months without entry of judgment, including any accompanying explanation provided by the Business Court.

The report shall include an accounting of all business court activities for the previous fiscal year, including the itemized annual expenditures.

Assist the Chief Justice in performing his duties relating to the transfer of district court judges for temporary or specialized duty.

(9a)

Establish and operate systems and services that provide for electronic filing in the court system and further provide electronic transaction processing and access to court information systems pursuant to

G.S. 7A-343.2

.

(9b)

Enter into contracts with one or more private vendors to provide for the payment of fines, fees, and costs due to the court by credit, charge, or debit cards; such contracts may provide for the assessment of a convenience or transaction fee by the vendor to cover the costs of providing this service.

(9c)

Prescribe policies and procedures for the appointment and payment of foreign language interpreters. These policies and procedures shall be applied uniformly throughout the General Court of Justice. After consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Director may also convert contractual foreign language interpreter positions to permanent State positions when the Director determines that it is more cost-effective to do so.

(9d)

Analyze the use of contractual positions in the Judicial Department and, after consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, convert contractual positions to permanent State positions when the Director determines it is in the best interests of the Judicial Department to do so.

(9e)

Prescribe policies and procedures for the appointment and payment of deaf and hearing-impaired interpreters, in accordance with

G.S. 8B-8(a)

, for those cases specified in

G.S. 8B-8(b)

and (c). These policies and procedures shall be applied uniformly throughout the General Court of Justice. After consultation with the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Director may also convert contractual hearing-impaired interpreter positions to permanent State positions when the Director determines that it is more cost-effective to do so.

(9f)

Prescribe policies and procedures for the payment of those experts acting on behalf of the court or prosecutorial offices, as provided for in G.S. 7A-314(d).

(9g)

Prescribe policies and procedures for chief district court judges to establish school-justice partnerships with local law enforcement agencies, local boards of education, and local school administrative units with the goal of reducing in-school arrests, out-of-school suspensions, and expulsions.

Perform such additional duties and exercise such additional powers as may be prescribed by statute or assigned by the Chief Justice.

Prescribe policies and procedures for the assignment and compensation of magistrates performing temporary duty outside their county of residence when exigent circumstances exist, as provided for in G.S. 7A-146(9).

Issue photographic identification cards to appropriate Judicial Department employees and officials authorizing those employees and officials to travel to and from, enter, and work in court and court-related locations for the conduct or support of essential court operations in preparation for, during, or in the aftermath of emergency situations, including, but not limited to, catastrophic conditions. Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, and notwithstanding any emergency restrictions on travel or closures that may have been issued due to the emergency situations, an identification card issued pursuant to this subdivision shall be honored by all State and local law enforcement, emergency and health officers, and other authorities to permit the person to whom the card was issued to travel to and from court and court-related locations and otherwise carry out the purposes authorized by this subdivision. An identification card issued pursuant to this subdivision shall set forth its effective date and the full name, position, and employing unit of the person to whom the card is issued, with a provision, signed by the person, stating that the person is credentialed solely for the purposes stated in this subdivision and that the card shall not be used for any other purpose.

Prescribe policies and procedures and establish and operate systems for the exchange of criminal and civil information from and to the Judicial Department and local, State, and federal governments and the Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians.

Transfer equipment and supply funds to the appropriate programs and between programs as the equipment priorities and supply consumptions occur during the operating year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of G.S. 138-6(a)(1), elect to establish a per-mile reimbursement rate for transportation by privately owned vehicles at a rate less than the business standard mileage rate set by the Internal Revenue Service.

Prepare and submit an annual report on appeals of termination of parental rights cases and transmit by February 1 of each year to the Chief Justice and the General Assembly. The report shall include the following information:

The number of notices of appeal for termination of parental rights cases that were properly filed with the trial court.

The date on which each notice of appeal for a termination of parental rights case was filed and the date that the record was filed with the Court of Appeals.

The date that the Court of Appeals issued a final opinion for each appeal for a termination of parental rights case.

For termination of parental rights cases heard by the Supreme Court, the date that the record is received by the Supreme Court and the date that the Supreme Court issued a final opinion.

For all appeals of termination of parental rights cases, the average age of those cases measured from both (i) the date the notice of appeal was filed and (ii) the date the record was filed with the court. This information shall be provided for both the Court of Appeals and the Supreme Court.

Review requests for private counsel for the defense of a Judicial Department official or employee. The Director may approve the expenditure of lapsed salary savings to retain private counsel to provide litigation services for the defense of an official or employee of the Judicial Department in any action arising from conduct undertaken in the course of the official’s or employee’s official duties and in which the Attorney General has declined to provide the litigation services. For purposes of this subdivision, the terms “litigation services” and “private counsel” are as defined in

G.S. 147-17

and

G.S. 114-2.3

.

History.

1965, c. 310, s. 1; 1967, c. 1049, s. 5; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1999-237, s. 17.15(a); 2006-187, ss. 1(b), 2(b), 5(b); 2007-393, s. 11; 2009-516, s. 3; 2010-31, s. 15.12; 2011-411, s. 2(a); 2012-142, s. 16.3(b); 2014-100, s. 18B.1(a); 2014-102, s. 5; 2015-241, s. 18A.1; 2017-57, ss. 16D.4(aa), 18B.4(b); 2018-138, s. 2.12(d); 2018-142, s. 23(b); 2019-243, s. 5(a); 2021-18, s. 4; 2021-180, s. 16.10(a).

School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

Session Laws
2011-145, s. 10.15(a)-(f), provides: “(a) School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative Established.

“(1) Purpose and duties. — There is established the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. The purpose of the Initiative is to identify and coordinate appropriate community services and supports for children at risk of school failure or out-of-home placement in order to address the physical, social, legal, emotional, and developmental factors that affect academic performance. The Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Public Instruction, the State Board of Education, the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [Division of Juvenile Justice], the Administrative Office of the Courts, and other State agencies that provide services for children shall share responsibility and accountability to improve outcomes for these children and their families. The Initiative shall be based on the following principles:

“a. The development of a strong infrastructure of interagency collaboration.

“b. One child, one team, one plan.

“c. Individualized, strengths-based care.

“d. Accountability.

“e. Cultural competence.

“f. Children at risk of school failure or out-of-home placement may enter the system through any participating agency.

“g. Services shall be specified, delivered, and monitored through a unified Child and Family Plan that is outcome-oriented and evaluation-based.

“h. Services shall be the most efficient in terms of cost and effectiveness and shall be delivered in the most natural settings possible.

“i. Out-of-home placements for children shall be a last resort and shall include concrete plans to bring the children back to a stable permanent home, their schools, and their community.

“j. Families and consumers shall be involved in decision making throughout service planning, delivery, and monitoring.

“(2) Program goals and services. — In order to ensure that children receiving services are appropriately served, the affected State and local agencies shall do the following:

“a. Increase capacity in the school setting to address the academic, health, mental health, social, and legal needs of children.

“b. Ensure that children receiving services are screened initially to identify needs and assessed periodically to determine progress and sustained improvement in educational, health, safety, behavioral, and social outcomes.

“c. Develop uniform screening mechanisms and a set of outcomes that are shared across affected agencies to measure children’s progress in home, school, and community settings.

“d. Promote practices that are known to be effective based upon research or national best practice standards.

“e. Review services provided across affected State agencies to ensure that children’s needs are met.

“f. Eliminate cost-shifting and facilitate cost-sharing among governmental agencies with respect to service development, service delivery, and monitoring for participating children and their families.

“g. Participate in a local memorandum of agreement signed annually by the participating superintendent of the local LEA, directors of the county departments of social services and health, director of the local management entity, the chief district court judge, and the chief district court counselor.

“(3) Local level responsibilities. — In coordination with the North Carolina Child and Family Leadership Council (Council), established in subsection (b) of this section, the local board of education shall establish the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative at designated schools and shall appoint the Child and Family Team Leaders, who shall be a school nurse and a school social worker. Each local management entity that has any selected schools in its catchment area shall appoint a Care Coordinator, and any department of social services that has a selected school in its catchment area shall appoint a Child and Family Teams Facilitator. The Care Coordinators and Child and Family Team Facilitators shall have as their sole responsibility working with the selected schools in their catchment areas and shall provide training to school-based personnel, as required. The Child and Family Team Leaders shall identify and screen children who are potentially at risk of academic failure or out-of-home placement due to physical, social, legal, emotional, or developmental factors. Based on the screening results, responsibility for developing, convening, and implementing the Child and Family Team Initiative is as follows:

“a. School personnel shall take the lead role for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to academic achievement.

“b. The local management entity shall take the lead role for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to mental health, substance abuse, or developmental disabilities and who meet the criteria for the target population established by the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.

“c. The local department of public health shall take the lead role for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are health-related.

“d. Local departments of social services shall take the lead for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to child welfare, abuse, or neglect.

“e. The chief district court counselor shall take the lead for those children and their families whose primary unmet needs are related to juvenile justice issues. A representative from each named or otherwise identified publicly supported children’s agency shall participate as a member of the Team as needed. Team members shall coordinate, monitor, and assure the successful implementation of a unified Child and Family Plan.

“(4) Reporting requirements. — School-Based Child and Family Team Leaders shall provide data to the Council for inclusion in their report to the North Carolina General Assembly. The report shall include the following:

“a. The number of and other demographic information on children screened and assigned to a team and a description of the services needed by and provided to these children.

“b. The number of and information about children assigned to a team who are placed in programs or facilities outside the child’s home or outside the child’s county and the average length of stay in residential treatment.

“c. The amount and source of funds expended to implement the Initiative.

“d. Information on how families and consumers are involved in decision making throughout service planning, delivery, and monitoring.

“e. Other information as required by the Council to evaluate success in local programs and ensure appropriate outcomes.

“f. Recommendations on needed improvements.

“(5) Local advisory committee. — In each county with a participating school, the superintendent of the local LEA shall either identify an existing cross-agency collaborative or council or shall form a new group to serve as a local advisory committee to work with the Initiative. Newly formed committees shall be chaired by the superintendent and one other member of the committee to be elected by the committee. The local advisory committee shall include the directors of the county departments of social services and health; the directors of the local management entity; the chief district court judge; the chief district court counselor; the director of a school-based or school-linked health center, if a center is located within the catchment area of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative; and representatives of other agencies providing services to children, as designated by the Committee. The members of the Committee shall meet as needed to monitor and support the successful implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. The Local Child and Family Team Advisory Committee may designate existing cross-agency collaboratives or councils as working groups or to provide assistance in accomplishing established goals.

“(b) North Carolina Child and Family Leadership Council. —

“(1) Leadership Council established; location. — There is established the North Carolina Child and Family Leadership Council (Council). The Council shall be located within the Department of Administration for organizational and budgetary purposes.

“(2) Purpose. — The purpose of the Council is to review and advise the Governor in the development of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and to ensure the active participation and collaboration in the Initiative by all State agencies and their local counterparts providing services to children in participating counties in order to increase the academic success of and reduce out-of-home and out-of-county placements of children at risk of academic failure.

“(3) Membership. — The Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Secretary of Health and Human Services shall serve as cochairs of the Council. Council membership shall include the Secretary of the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [Secretary of Public Safety], the Chair of the State Board of Education, the Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts, and other members as appointed by the Governor.

“(4) The Council shall do the following:

“a. Sign an annual memorandum of agreement (MOA) among the named State agencies to define the purposes of the program and to ensure that program goals are accomplished.

“b. Resolve State policy issues, as identified at the local level, which interfere with effective implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

“c. Direct the integration of resources, as needed, to meet goals and ensure that the Initiative promotes the most effective and efficient use of resources and eliminates duplication of effort.

“d. Establish criteria for defining success in local programs and ensure appropriate outcomes.

“e. Develop an evaluation process, based on expected outcomes, to ensure the goals and objectives of this Initiative are achieved.

“f. Review progress made on integrating policies and resources across State agencies, reaching expected outcomes, and accomplishing other goals.

“g. Report semiannually, on January 1 and July 1, on progress made and goals achieved to the Office of the Governor, the Joint Appropriations Committees and Subcommittees on Education, Justice and Public Safety, and Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division of the Legislative Services Office. The Council may designate existing cross-agency collaboratives or councils as working groups or to provide assistance in accomplishing established goals.

“(c) Department of Health and Human Services. — The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services shall ensure that all agencies within the Department collaborate in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.

“(d) Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [Division of Juvenile Justice]. — The Secretary of the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [Secretary of Public Safety] shall ensure that all agencies within the Department [Division] collaborate in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.

“(e) Administrative Office of the Courts. — The Director of the Administrative Office of the Courts shall ensure that the Office collaborates in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and shall provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.

“(f) Department of Public Instruction. — The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall ensure that the Department collaborates in the development and implementation of the School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative and shall provide all required support to ensure that the Initiative is successful.”

§ 7A-343.1.
Distribution of copies of the appellate division reports.

The Administrative Officer of the Courts shall, upon request and at the State’s expense, distribute such number of copies of the appellate division reports to federal, State departments and agencies, and to educational institutions of instruction, as follows:

Click to viewThe copies of reports furnished to each justice of the Supreme Court and judge of the Court of Appeals as set out in the table above may be retained personally by the justice or judge.

A recipient listed in subsection (a) of this section may choose not to receive its copies of the appellate division reports, or choose to receive fewer than the number of copies allotted to it, by notifying the Administrative Officer of the Courts in writing. Should the recipient again wish to receive its full allotment of the appellate division reports, the recipient shall notify the Administrative Officer of the Courts in writing, and the Administrative Officer of the Courts may, in his or her discretion, resume distribution to the recipient.

Attorney General 5 Utilities Commission 1 Industrial Commission 1 Office of Administrative Hearings 2 Archives and History, Division of 1 Legislative Building Library 2 Justices of the Supreme Court 1 ea. Judges of the Court of Appeals 1 ea. Judges of the Superior Court 1 ea. Clerks of the Superior Court 1 ea. District Attorneys 1 ea. Supreme Court of North Carolina Library AS MANY AS REQUESTED Appellate Division Reporter 1 University of North Carolina School Law 5 North Carolina Central University School of Law 5 Duke University School of Law 5 Wake Forest University School of Law 5 Elon University School of Law 5 Campbell University School of Law 5 United States Department of Justice 1 Library of Congress 1 Federal Judges resident in North Carolina 1 ea. Librarian, Supreme Court of the United States 1 United States Attorneys resident in North Carolina 1 ea. Supreme Court Library exchange list 1 Cherokee Supreme Court, Eastern Band of Cherokee Indians 3

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 84; 1977, c. 379, s. 2; c. 771, s. 4; 1979, c. 899, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1278; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 1022, s. 2; 1987, c. 877, s. 1; 1989, c. 727, s. 218(1); 1993, c. 257, s. 19; 1995, c. 166, s. 1; c. 509, s. 4; 1997-261, s. 109; 1997-443, s. 11A.7; 1998-202, s. 4(a); 2000-137, s. 4(b); 2001-280, s. 1; 2011-145, ss. 19.1(g), 19.1(dd); 2011-401, s. 3.1; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c); 2015-40, s. 1; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s), (u); 2017-186, s. 2(e); 2018-40, s. 5.

§ 7A-343.2.
Court Information Technology Fund.

Fund. — The Court Information Technology Fund is established within the Judicial Department as a special revenue fund. Interest and other investment income earned by the Fund accrues to it. The Fund consists of the following revenues:

All monies collected by the Director pursuant to G.S. 7A-109(d) and

G.S. 7A-49.5

.

State judicial facilities fees credited to the Fund under

G.S. 7A-304

through

G.S. 7A-307

.

Use. — Money in the Fund derived from State judicial facilities fees must be used to upgrade, maintain, and operate the judicial and county courthouse telecommunications and data connectivity. All other monies in the Fund must be used to supplement funds otherwise available to the Judicial Department for court information technology and office automation needs.

Report. — The Director must report annually by August 1 of each year to the Chairs of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Chairs of the Senate and House Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety. The report must include the following:

Amounts credited in the preceding fiscal year to the Fund.

Amounts expended in the preceding fiscal year from the Fund and the purposes of the expenditures.

Proposed expenditures of the monies in the Fund.

History.

1999-237, s. 17.15(b); 2000-67, s. 15.1; 2006-187, s. 2(d); 2008-107, s. 29.8(e); 2009-570, s. 2; 2014-100, s. 18B.1(b); 2015-241, s. 18A.23(a).

§ 7A-343.3.
Appellate Courts Printing and Computer Operations Fund.

The Appellate Courts Printing and Computer Operations Fund is established within the Judicial Department as a nonreverting, interest-bearing special revenue account. Accordingly, interest and other investment income earned by the Fund shall be credited to it. All moneys collected through charges to litigants for document management and the reproduction of appellate records and briefs under

G.S. 7A-11

and

G.S. 7A-20(b)

shall be remitted to the State Treasurer and held in this Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used to support the document management shop operations of the Supreme Court and the Court of Appeals, including personnel, maintenance, and capital costs. The Judicial Department may create and maintain receipt-supported positions for these purposes but shall report to the Chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety prior to creating such new positions.

History.

2002-126, s. 14.12; 2015-40, s. 8; 2021-180, s. 16.12(b).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 16.12(c ), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 16.12(b), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to services rendered on or after that date.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-40, s. 8, effective July 1, 2015, deleted the former last paragraph in the section, which read: “The Judicial Department shall report to the Chairs of the Senate and House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittees on Justice and Public Safety by January 1 of each year on all receipts and expenditures of the Fund.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 16.12(b), added “document management and” preceding “litigants for” in the third sentence”; and substituted “document management shop” for “print shop” in the fourth sentence. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 7A-343.4.
Internal audit standards; report and work papers.

Internal audits shall comply with current Standards for the Professional Practice of Internal Auditing issued by the Institute for Internal Auditors and, when appropriate, Government Auditing Standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the Internal Audit Division shall maintain all audit reports, examinations, investigations, surveys, drafts, work papers, and all other documents prepared by the internal auditors in accordance with the North Carolina Court System’s Rules of Recordkeeping and Records Retention and Disposition Schedule (the Rules). Except as provided in this section, or upon an order issued in Wake County Superior Court upon 10 days’ notice and hearing finding that access is necessary to a proper administration of justice, audit work papers, drafts, and all audit documents other than the final audit report are available only to the Internal Audit Division, the Director, the Chief Financial Officer, Legal Services, and other persons in the internal auditor’s discretion for the limited purpose of ensuring the accuracy and reliability of the final audit report. Pertinent work papers and other supportive material related to issued audit reports may be, at the discretion of the internal auditor and unless otherwise prohibited by law, made available for inspection by duly authorized representatives of the State and federal government who desire access to and inspection of such records in connection with some matter officially before them, including criminal investigations.

Where the professional guidelines, government standards, and the Rules fail to specify or are in conflict, the Rules shall govern.

History.

2009-516, s. 5.